Hawaii statutes.
§171-92 Existing public leases. Where
a person has an unexpired lease, including a residential lease, of public land
damaged by a natural disaster and rebuilding on such land is not prohibited,
the board of land and natural resources may negotiate an extension of the lease
to make it economically feasible to rebuild, or may, by mutual agreement with
the lessee and the holder of record having security interest, cancel the
unexpired term of the lease and negotiate a new lease with the person. [L 1962,
c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-87; HRS §171-92]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next